Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 2. Moderate Cost and Rental Housing.

Cross references. —

For exemption from taxes or execution of property held by the corporation for a purpose set out in AS

18.55.300

—

18.55.470

, see AS

18.55.620

.

Collateral references. —

40A Am. Jur. 2d, Housing Laws and Urban Redevelopment, §§ 16 — 23, 29 — 32.

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, §§ 51 — 64, 71.

Validity of zoning for senior citizen communities. 83 ALR3d 1084.

Validity, construction, and application of inclusionary zoning ordinances and programs. 22 ALR6th 295.

Sec. 18.55.300.
Declaration of purpose.

The legislature declares that in addition to an acute shortage of low-income rental housing there is a serious shortage of moderate-cost and rental housing for families of the state, endangering their health and constituting a menace to the health, safety, morals, welfare, and comfort of the people of the state and a serious deterrent to the development of the state, and that this situation constitutes an emergency requiring positive action by the legislature.

History.

(§ 1 ch 13 SLA 1949)

Opinions of attorney general. —

The express purpose of this section is entirely consistent with a local government’s exercise of powers on the same subject.
Feb. 2, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.55.310.
Powers and duties of corporation.

The corporation shall construct, protect, operate, maintain, rent, and sell at the places in the state that it considers most appropriate moderate-cost or rental housing facilities and projects for veterans and other residents of the state. For this purpose the corporation may accept money from any source, including the federal government, and may enter into appropriate contracts, including contracts with the federal government.

History.

(§ 3 ch 13 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 127 SLA 1949; am § 31 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.320.
Sale of surplus property.

The corporation may sell a property held by it under AS

18.55.300

—

18.55.470

that it finds is in excess of its needs. The sale shall be by public auction or by sealed bids at a price not lower than the fair market value determined by an appraisal made within 180 days of the sale by a qualified appraiser. Public notice shall be given by publishing notice of the sale at least once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the area in which the property to be sold is located and by posting notice of sale in at least two public places in the area. In no event shall the auction be held less than 30 days after the last day of publication. If no acceptable bids are received the corporation may sell the property at negotiated sale, within six months of the date of auction. A negotiated sale may not be made on an appraisal made more than nine months before the date of sale. The price at a negotiated sale may not be less than the appraised value except as provided in (b) of this section.

The sale may be made to a state or federal agency or political subdivision for less than the appraised value without competitive bidding as required in (a) of this section if the board determines that it is in the best interests of the public with due consideration given to the nature of the public services or functions rendered by the agency or political subdivision making application and of the terms under which the land was acquired.

History.

(§ 3 ch 13 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 127 SLA 1949; am §§ 2, 3 ch 91 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 148, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, “corporation” was substituted for “authority” in two occurrences in (a) of this section.

Administrative Code. —

For HUD assisted disposition of real property acquired under renewal and neighborhood development programs, see 15 AAC 150, art. 5.

For definitions, see 15 AAC 150, art. 6.

Sec. 18.55.330.
Preference to veterans.

The corporation shall initially offer 50 percent of the dwelling units in a housing project held by it under AS

18.55.300

—

18.55.470

for rent or sale to veterans. The offer shall be by publication of reasonable notice in a newspaper circulated in the area in which the housing project is located. The corporation shall set aside these units for rental or sale to veterans for at least 30 days following first publication of the notice before making them available to other residents. If, after an additional 30 days a unit remains unassigned, the corporation may rent or sell it to any person in the state, provided that residents have first preference.

History.

(§ 4 ch 13 SLA 1949; am § 32 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.340.
Care, operation, maintenance, and rental of housing.

The corporation has control over and is responsible for the care, operation, maintenance, and rental or sale of the housing held by it under AS

18.55.300

—

18.55.470

. It may enter into appropriate arrangements for carrying out this responsibility and for safeguarding the interest of the state.

History.

(§ 5 ch 13 SLA 1949; am § 33 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.350.
Availability of housing units.

The corporation shall make the housing units held by it under AS

18.55.300

—

18.55.470

available for rental to eligible persons upon application in the form it prescribes, and at the moderate rentals that it considers proper, or for sale at the prices and subject to the terms and conditions that it considers fair and equitable. The corporation shall use the money it receives from the sale of housing or housing projects held by it under AS

18.55.300

—

18.55.470

, and the revenue from rentals, after payment of obligations and deductions for proper expenses of maintenance and operation, for the construction of further housing, under the terms of AS 18.55.300 — 18.55.470.

History.

(§ 6 ch 13 SLA 1949; am § 2 ch 127 SLA 1949; am § 34 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.360.
Alaska State Housing Authority Revolving Fund. [Repealed, § 72 ch 113 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 18.55.370.
Use of money.

Money appropriated or made available under AS

18.55.300

—

18.55.470

may be used by the corporation to make

character loans, not exceeding $500 for each dwelling, to residents or cooperatives for the improvement, conversion, or construction of dwellings in remote areas for occupancy by the residents or members of the cooperatives;

loans for moderate-cost or rental housing facilities and projects to public agencies, or private nonprofit or limited dividend corporations, or private corporations or cooperatives organized under AS

10.15.005

—

10.15.600

that are regulated or restricted by the corporation until the termination of all loan obligations to it as to rents or sales, charges, capital structure, rate of return, and methods of operation to the extent and in the manner that provides reasonable rentals to tenants and a reasonable return on the investment; loans to cooperatives may be made for up to 95 percent of the appraised value of the housing facility.

History.

(§ 8 ch 13 SLA 1949; am § 3 ch 127 SLA 1949; am § 2 ch 134 SLA 1976; am § 35 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.375.
Investment of state surplus. [Repealed, § 33 ch 141 SLA 1988.]

Sec. 18.55.380.
Corporation may use powers under other laws.

The corporation may invoke a power given to it under any statute, including the powers of eminent domain and those relating to the issuance of bonds and obligations with respect to a project undertaken or loan made or to be made under the authorization provided in AS

18.55.300

—

18.55.470

.

History.

(§ 8 ch 13 SLA 1949; am § 3 ch 127 SLA 1949; am § 36 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.390.
Limitation on corporation’s power.

The power of the corporation to act under AS

18.55.300

—

18.55.470

is limited to projects in which adequate financing on reasonable terms is not otherwise available or entrepreneurial sponsorship is lacking.

History.

(§ 8 ch 13 SLA 1949; am § 3 ch 127 SLA 1949; am § 37 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.400.
Expenditure of money.

The corporation may spend the portion of the money appropriated under AS

18.55.300

—

18.55.470

that it considers advisable, either directly or in cooperation with educational institutions or government agencies, to develop, through study, research, and analysis, information regarding low cost building supplies, materials, and methods of construction, and to disseminate this information.

History.

(§ 9 ch 13 SLA 1949; am § 38 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.410.
Power to sell, transfer, or dispose of projects.

The corporation may at any time sell, transfer, or otherwise dispose of a housing project under AS

18.55.300

—

18.55.470

to the federal government, provided the corporation is completely relieved of all obligations assumed or guaranteed by it in connection with the housing project.
Upon the disposal, the provisions of AS

18.55.300

—

18.55.470

no longer apply to the housing project.

History.

(§ 10 ch 13 SLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 148, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, “corporation” was substituted for “authority” in two occurrences in this section.

Administrative Code. —

For HUD assisted disposition of real property acquired under renewal and neighborhood development programs, see 15 AAC 150, art. 5.

For definitions, see 15 AAC 150, art. 6.

Sec. 18.55.420.
Regulations; allocation of units and projects.

The corporation may

adopt and enforce reasonable rules and regulations under AS

18.56.088

to carry out the purposes of AS

18.55.300

—

18.55.470

; and

determine the allocation of dwelling units and projects constructed in a municipality on the basis of the municipality’s population or the demand or potential demand for dwelling units in it.

History.

(§ 11 ch 13 SLA 1949; am § 39 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For HUD assisted disposition of real property acquired under renewal and neighborhood development programs, see 15 AAC 150, art. 5.

For definitions, see 15 AAC 150, art. 6.

For low-income housing tax credit, see 15 AAC 151, art. 8.

Sec. 18.55.430.
Authority to submit annual report. [Repealed, § 140 ch 4 FSSLA 1992.]

Sec. 18.55.440.
Additional powers to acquire land or interests in land.

For the purpose of carrying out AS

18.55.300

—

18.55.470

, the corporation may acquire by purchase, lease, condemnation, or otherwise,

land and appurtenances to land necessary or desirable for the establishment, construction, and operation of moderate cost and moderate rental housing;

rights-of-way or easements for roads, streets, trails, utilities, power lines, and other similar facilities necessary and desirable for the proper establishment, operation, and maintenance of a housing project.

History.

(§ 12 ch 13 SLA 1949; am § 40 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.450.
Ability to accept land and other property.

The corporation may accept land, a building, property, or equipment that is available from an executive department, independent establishment or agency of the federal government or the state, or a municipality, for the purpose of carrying out AS

18.55.300

—

18.55.470

.

History.

(§ 13 ch 13 SLA 1949; am § 41 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.460.
Preference for state professional and contractors’ services.

In planning, designing, and constructing projects under AS

18.55.300

—

18.55.470

, the corporation shall use professional and contractor services of state residents as far as practicable and shall encourage the use of local building materials.

History.

(§ 14 ch 13 SLA 1949; am § 42 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.470.
Definitions.

In AS

18.55.300

—

18.55.470

,

“corporation” means the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation;

“moderate cost” means a cost determined by the corporation that is below the level at which private enterprise is currently building a needed volume of reasonably safe and sanitary dwellings for sale in the locality involved;

“moderate rental” means a rental rate determined by the corporation that is below the level at which the dwellings are currently being offered for rent by private persons in the locality involved;

“veteran” means a person

honorably separated from the military service of the United States who has at any time resided continuously for at least one year in the state and who served in the armed forces of the United States for at least 90 days or whose service was for less than 90 days because of injury or disability incurred in the line of duty,

between September 16, 1940, and July 25, 1947;

between June 25, 1950, and January 31, 1955;

between August 4, 1964, and November 7, 1975;

between August 2, 1990, and January 2, 1992;

beginning September 11, 2001, and ending on the day prescribed by Presidential proclamation or by law as the last date of Operation Iraqi Freedom; or

during any of the time periods listed in 5 U.S.C. 2108(1);

who served in the Alaska Territorial Guard for at least 90 days or whose service was for less than 90 days because of injury or disability incurred in the line of duty, and who has at any time resided continuously for at least one year in the state;

who is the spouse or widow or widower of a person described under (A) or (B) of this paragraph.

History.

(§ 2 ch 13 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 36 SLA 1968; am § 19 ch 67 SLA 1983; am § 75 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 4 ch 93 SLA 1991; am § 43 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 3 ch 102 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 148, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, “corporation” was substituted for “authority” in each of (2) and (3) of this section.

Cross references. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 102, SLA 2014, amending paragraph (4) of this section, see 2014 Senate Journal 1469 — 1470.